dev/determiner/determiner.bn.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="enclitic">
      <!-- passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- ই -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ই</l>
          <r><j/>ই<s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- ও -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ও</l>
          <r><j/>ও<s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="এর__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="তত__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ঐ__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/ওই__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ঐ</l>
          <r>ওই<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="উভয়__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>
  <section id="main" type="standard">
    <e lm="ঐ"><i>ঐ</i><par n="ঐ__det"/></e>
    <e lm="তত"><i>তত</i><par n="তত__det"/></e>
    <e lm="তোমাদের"><i>তোমাদের</i><par n="এর__det"/></e>
    <e lm="তাঁর"><i>তাঁর</i><par n="এর__det"/></e>
    <e lm="এখানকার"><i>এখানকার</i><par n="উভয়__det"/></e>
    <e lm="যেকোনো"><i>যেকোনো</i><par n="উভয়__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ওদের"><i>ওদের</i><par n="এর__det"/></e>
    <e lm="সেই"><i>সেই</i><par n="ঐ__det"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রত্যেক"><i>প্রত্যেক</i><par n="উভয়__det"/></e>
    <e lm="তার"><i>তার</i><par n="এর__det"/></e>
    <e lm="এরই"><i>এরই</i><par n="এর__det"/></e>
    <e lm="আরেকটি"><i>আরেকটি</i><par n="উভয়__det"/></e>
    <e lm="এগুলোর"><i>এগুলোর</i><par n="এর__det"/></e>
    <e lm="কতটুকু"><i>কতটুকু</i><par n="তত__det"/></e>
    <e lm="আরেক"><i>আরেক</i><par n="উভয়__det"/></e>
    <e lm="তাদের"><i>তাদের</i><par n="এর__det"/></e>
    <e lm="তোর"><i>তোর</i><par n="এর__det"/></e>
    <e lm="তাঁদের"><i>তাঁদের</i><par n="এর__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ঐগুলোর"><i>ঐগুলোর</i><par n="এর__det"/></e>
    <e lm="কয়টি"><i>কয়টি</i><par n="তত__det"/></e>
    <e lm="কটি"><i>কটি</i><par n="তত__det"/></e>
    <e lm="তারই"><i>তারই</i><par n="এর__det"/></e>
    <e lm="এটার"><i>এটার</i><par n="এর__det"/></e>
    <e lm="তোমার"><i>তোমার</i><par n="এর__det"/></e>
    <e lm="একটা"><i>একটা</i><par n="তত__det"/></e>
    <e lm="এই"><i>এই</i><par n="ঐ__det"/></e>
    <e lm="কোনো"><i>কোনো</i><par n="উভয়__det"/></e>
    <e lm="আমাদের"><i>আমাদের</i><par n="এর__det"/></e>
    <e lm="তোদের"><i>তোদের</i><par n="এর__det"/></e>
    <e lm="জনৈক"><i>জনৈক</i><par n="উভয়__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ওগুলোর"><i>ওগুলোর</i><par n="এর__det"/></e>
    <e lm="আপনার"><i>আপনার</i><par n="এর__det"/></e>
    <e lm="উভয়"><i>উভয়</i><par n="উভয়__det"/></e>
    <e lm="আমার"><i>আমার</i><par n="এর__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ওর"><i>ওর</i><par n="এর__det"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রতিটি"><i>প্রতিটি</i><par n="উভয়__det"/></e>
    <e lm="সেসব"><i>সেসব</i><par n="উভয়__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ওই"><i></i><par n="/ওই__det"/></e>
    <e lm="কারো"><i>কারো</i><par n="এর__det"/></e>
    <e lm="কয়েকটি"><i>কয়েকটি</i><par n="তত__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ওটার"><i>ওটার</i><par n="এর__det"/></e>
    <e lm="যেসব"><i>যেসব</i><par n="উভয়__det"/></e>
    <e lm="এদের"><i>এদের</i><par n="এর__det"/></e>
    <e lm="আপনাদের"><i>আপনাদের</i><par n="এর__det"/></e>
    <e lm="এর"><i>এর</i><par n="এর__det"/></e>

  </section>
</dictionary>
